California, session 20252026, AB24.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited as, the Give San Diego Rural Communities a Voice Act.SECTION 1.SEC. 2. Section 132351.1 of the Public Utilities Code is amended to read:132351.1. (a) A board of directors consisting of 21 members shall govern the consolidated agency.(b) For purposes of this chapter, “governing body” means the board of supervisors, council, council and mayor where the mayor is not a member of the council, authority, trustees, director, commission, committee, or other policymaking body, as appropriate, that exercises authority over an entity represented on the board of the consolidated agency.(c) All powers, privileges, and duties vested in or imposed upon the consolidated agency shall be exercised and performed by and through a board of directors. The exercise of all executive, administrative, and ministerial power may be delegated and redelegated by the board to any of the offices, officers, or committees created pursuant to this chapter or created by the board acting pursuant to this chapter.(d) (1) The board shall be composed all of the following:(A) The mayor and the president of the city council of the City of San Diego, one of whom shall serve as a primary representative and one of whom shall serve as a secondary representative.(B) The mayor or a councilperson from each city in the county except the City of San Diego, each of whom shall serve as a primary representative.(C) One member of the Board of Supervisors of San Diego County from an unincorporated area of the county.(D) One representative from the Association of Planning Groups - San Diego County.(2) Each director shall be selected, and all vacancies shall be filled, by the governing body they represent. Each director shall serve until recalled by that governing body.(3) (A) Each governing body shall also select one alternate to serve on the board when the primary or secondary representative, if applicable, is not available. The alternate shall be subject to the same restrictions and have the same powers, when serving on the board, as the representative for whom the alternate is substituting.(B) At its discretion, each city or county may select a second alternate, in the same manner as the first alternate, to serve on the board in the event that both the primary representative and the first alternate are unable to attend a meeting of the board. This alternate shall be subject to the same restrictions and have the same powers, when serving on the board, as the primary representative.(4) The board may allow for the appointment of advisory representatives to sit with the board, but those representatives shall not be authorized to vote. The current advisory representatives to the San Diego Association of Governments may continue their advisory representation on the consolidated agency at the discretion of their governing body. The governing bodies of the County of Imperial and the cities in that county may collectively designate an advisory representative to sit with the board.SEC. 2.SEC. 3. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.